Illinois, session 104th, SB2312.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $50,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Capital Projects 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for a grant to the DuPage Children's Museum for costs 8associated with capital improvements. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.